Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Chapter 17. Forest Resources and Practices.

Administrative Code. —

For forest resources and practices, see 11 AAC 95.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Proposed regulation establishing compliance with management practice under AS 41.17 and regulations as an affirmative defense to prosecution for alleged water quality violations for the forestry industry alone would cause an equal protection problem; executive agency cannot, by regulation, create an affirmative defense to what the legislature has determined should be prosecuted. 1980 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 10.

The 1990 changes to former AS

47.17.010

(6), on their face, make the habitat standards found in 6 AAC 80.130 — .150 inapplicable to activities such as the use of herbicides for reforestation purposes. June 17, 2002 Op. Att’y Gen.